District of Columbia statutes.
50-1607

Child safety helmet education program.

(a)

Within 60 days of May 23, 2000, the District Department of Transportation, in conjunction with the Metropolitan Police Department and District of Columbia Public Schools, shall develop and implement a public education program to educate adults and children under 16 years of age on the requirements of this subchapter and the importance of properly wearing bicycle safety helmets.

(b)

By October 1, of each year, the District Department of Transportation shall provide the Council of the District of Columbia, Committee on Public Works and the Environment, or a successor committee, a report summarizing the public education activities completed during the previous fiscal year, along with any statistics collected regarding bicycle accidents and injuries during the preceding fiscal year.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 8, 32 DCR 764
as added May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-112, § 2(b), 47 DCR 1985
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-184, § 2(c), 55 DCR 6101
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 238(c), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-184, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “District Department of Transportation” for “Department of Public Works”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b).